apertium-mt-ar.ar.dix
    <pardef n="/ذلك__prn">
      <e>       <p><l>ذلك</l> <r>ذلك<s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تلك</l> <r>ذلك<s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ذانك</l> <r>ذلك<s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تانك</l> <r>ذلك<s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>أولالك</l><r>ذلك<s n="prn"/><s n="def"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="שלי__prn">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="חלק__prn">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



    <!-- SECTION: Prepositions -->


    <pardef n="من__pr">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- different forms with and without suffixes -->
    <pardef n="ل__pr">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/></r></p><par n="ه__prn"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- different forms with and without suffixes, ي ending: special p1 sg form -->
    <pardef n="في__pr"> 
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/></r></p><par n="ي/ه__prn"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- one form with and without suffixes -->
    <pardef n="مع__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><par n="ل__pr"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->

    <pardef n="ה__det">
      <e><p>          <l>ال</l><r>ال<s n="det"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/هذا__det" c="this">
      <e>       <p><l>هذا</l> <r>هذا<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>هذه</l> <r>هذا<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>هذان</l> <r>هذا<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>هتان</l> <r>هذا<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>هؤلاء</l><r>هذا<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>أولائك</l><r>هذا<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/ذلك__det" c="that">
      <e>       <p><l>ذلك</l> <r>ذلك<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تلك</l> <r>ذلك<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ذانك</l> <r>ذلك<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تانك</l> <r>ذلك<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>أولالك</l><r>ذلك<s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ה" c="appears before nouns">
    <!-- miri: and before adjectives - both in Hebrew & in Arabic -->
      <e><p>          <l></l><r></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ال</l><r>ال<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="פחות__det">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="הרבה__det">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="כמה__det">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="אין__det">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="כל__det" c="all">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    
<!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

    <pardef n="/واحد__num" c="1">
      <e><p><l>واحد</l><r>واحد<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>أحد</l><r>واحد<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>واحدة</l><r>واحد<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>إحدى</l><r>واحد<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="اثن/ان__num" c="2">
      <e><p><l>ان</l><r>ان<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>تان</l><r>ان<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ثلاث__num">   <!--old -->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ثلاث/ة__num" c="3-7,9">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ة<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ة</l><r>ة<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ثمان/ية__num" c="8">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ية<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r>ية<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ية</l><r>ية<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="عشر/ة__num" c="10">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ة<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ة</l><r>ة<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="/أحد_عشر__num" c="11">
      <e><p><l>أحد<b/>عشر</l><r>أحد<b/>عشر<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>إحدى<b/>عشرة</l><r>أحد<b/>عشر<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="اثن/ا_عشر__num" c="12">
      <e><p><l>ا<b/>عشر</l><r>ا<b/>عشر<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>تا<b/>عشرة</l><r>ا<b/>عشر<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ثلاث/ة_عشر__num" c="13-19">
      <e><p><l><b/>عشرة</l><r>ة<b/>عشر<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ة<b/>عشر</l><r>ة<b/>عشر<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="عشر/ون__num" c="20,...,90">
      <e><p><l>ون</l><r>ون<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<!--  <e><p><l>ونات</l><r>ون<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> -->
    </pardef>  

    <pardef n="م/ئة__num" c="100">
      <e><p><l>ئة</l><r>ئة<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ائة</l><r>ئة<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ئتان</l><r>ئة<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ئة<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- TODO -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ثلاث/مئة__num" c="300,...,900">
      <e><p><l>مئة</l><r>مئة<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>مئة</l><r>مئة<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ألف__num" c="1000">
      <e><p><l>ألف</l><r>ألف<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ألفان</l><r>ألف<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>آلاف</l><r>ألف<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ألوف</l><r>ألف<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="مل/يون__num" c="million, billion">
      <e><p><l>يون</l><r>يون<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ايين</l><r>يون<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="זוג__num" c="couple/pair">
      <e><p><l/>         <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="XVI__num">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="أو/ل__num"> <!-- 1st -->
      <e><p><l>ل</l><r>ل<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ائل</l><r>ل<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>لون</l><r>ل<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>لى</l><r>ل<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ليات</l><r>ل<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ال"><i></i><par n="ה__det"/></e>
    <e lm="هذا"><i></i><par n="/هذا__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ذلك"><i></i><par n="/ذلك__det"/></e>
    <e lm="جدا"><i>جدا</i><par n="הרבה__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ذلك" c="that"><i></i><par n="/ذلك__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="في"><i>في</i><par n="في__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="لدى"><i>لدى</i><par n="من__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="لدى"><p><l>لدي</l><r>لدى</r></p><par n="في__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="من"><i>من</i><par n="مع__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="إلى"><i>إلى</i><par n="من__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="إلى"><p><l>إلي</l><r>إلى</r></p><par n="في__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="قرب"><i>قرب</i><par n="مع__pr"/></e>
    <e><i>ل</i><par n="ل__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="أقرب"><i>أقرب</i><par n="مع__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="وراء"><i>وراء</i><par n="من__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="وراء"><p><l>ورائ</l><r>وراء</r></p><par n="ل__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="حول"><i>حول</i><par n="مع__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="دون"><i>دون</i><par n="مع__pr"/></e>
    <e><i>ك</i><par n="ل__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="بلا"><i>بلا</i><par n="من__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="رغم"><i>رغم</i><par n="مع__pr"/></e>
    <e><i>ب</i><par n="ل__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="حول"><i>حسب</i><par n="مع__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="وقت"><i>وقت</i><par n="من__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="إلا"><i>إلا</i><par n="من__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="اثنان" c="two"><par n="ה"/><i>اثنان</i><par n="ثلاث__num"/></e>
    <e lm="خمس" c="five"><i>خمس</i><par n="ثلاث__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ست" c="six"><i>ست</i><par n="ثلاث__num"/></e>
    <e lm="زوج" c="couple"><i>زوج</i><par n="זוג__num"/></e>
    <e lm="واحد" c="one"><par n="/واحد__num"/></e>
    <e lm="اثنان" c="two"><i>اثن</i><par n="اثن/ان__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ثلاثة" c="three"><i>ثلاث</i><par n="ثلاث/ة__num"/></e>
    <e lm="أربعة" c="four"><i>أربع</i><par n="ثلاث/ة__num"/></e>
    <e lm="خمسة" c="five"><i>خمس</i><par n="ثلاث/ة__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ستة" c="six"><i>ست</i><par n="ثلاث/ة__num"/></e>
    <e lm="سبعة" c="seven"><i>سبع</i><par n="ثلاث/ة__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ثمانية" c="eight"><i>ثمان</i><par n="ثمان/ية__num"/></e>
    <e lm="تسعة" c="nine"><i>تسع</i><par n="ثلاث/ة__num"/></e>
    <e lm="عشرة" c="ten"><i>عشر</i><par n="عشر/ة__num"/></e>
    <e lm="أحد عشر" c="eleven"><par n="/أحد_عشر__num"/></e>
    <e lm="اثنا عشر" c="twelve"><i>اثن</i><par n="اثن/ا_عشر__num"/></e>
    <e lm="أربعة عشر" c="fourteen"><i>أربع</i><par n="ثلاث/ة_عشر__num"/></e>
    <e lm="خمسة عشر" c="fifteen"><i>خمس</i><par n="ثلاث/ة_عشر__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ستة عشر" c="sixteen"><i>ست</i><par n="ثلاث/ة_عشر__num"/></e>
    <e lm="سبعة عشر" c="seventeen"><i>سبع</i><par n="ثلاث/ة_عشر__num"/></e>
    <e lm="تسعة عشر" c="nineteen"><i>تسع</i><par n="ثلاث/ة_عشر__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ثلاثون" c="thirty"><i>ثلاث</i><par n="عشر/ون__num"/></e>
    <e lm="أربعون" c="forty"><i>أربع</i><par n="عشر/ون__num"/></e>
    <e lm="خمسون" c="fifty"><i>خمس</i><par n="عشر/ون__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ستون" c="sixty"><i>ست</i><par n="عشر/ون__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ثمانون" c="eighty"><i>ثمان</i><par n="عشر/ون__num"/></e>
    <e lm="مئة" c="hundred"><i>م</i><par n="م/ئة__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ألف" c="thousand"><i/><par n="/ألف__num"/></e>
    <e lm="مليون" c="million"><i>مل</i><par n="مل/يون__num"/></e>
    <e lm="بليون" c="billion"><i>بل</i><par n="مل/يون__num"/></e>
    <e lm="تريليون" c="trillion"><i>تريل</i><par n="مل/يون__num"/></e>
    <e lm="זוג" c="couple"><i>זוג</i><par n="זוג__num"/></e>
    <e lm="II" c=""><i>II</i><par n="XVI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="III" c=""><i>III</i><par n="XVI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="IV" c=""><i>IV</i><par n="XVI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="VI" c=""><i>VI</i><par n="XVI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="XII" c=""><i>XII</i><par n="XVI__num"/></e>
    <e lm="أول" c="first"><i>أو</i><par n="أو/ل__num"/></e>
    <e lm="طقس" c="weather" ><par n="ה"/><i></i><par n="طقس__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="بيت" c="house" ><par n="ה"/><i>بي</i><par n="بي/ت__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="سنة" c="year"><par n="ה"/><i>سن</i><par n="سن/ة__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="كرسي" c="chair" ><par n="ה"/><i>كر</i><par n="كر/سي__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="صوت" c="sound" ><par n="ה"/><i></i><par n="/صوت__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="بارد"><par n="ה"/><i>بارد</i><par n="جميل__adj"/></e>
